src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_njamma_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:


  Noun - rahka: # - ok
    rahka+N+Sg+Nom:  rahka
    rahka+N+Sg+Gen:  rahka
    rahka+N+Sg+Acc:  rahka
    rahka+N+Sg+Ill:  raahkan
    rahka+N+Sg+Loc:  rahkaast
    rahka+N+Sg+Com:  rahkain
    rahka+N+Sg+Abe:  rahkattáá
    rahka+N+Ess:  rahkan
    rahka+N+Par:  rahkad
    rahka+N+Pl+Nom:  rahkah
    rahka+N+Pl+Gen:  rahkai
    rahka+N+Pl+Acc:  rahkaid
    rahka+N+Pl+Ill:  rahkaid
    rahka+N+Pl+Loc:  rahkain
    rahka+N+Pl+Com:  [rahkaiguin, rahkaigijn] 
    rahka+N+Pl+Abe:  rahkaittáá

  Noun - njamma: # - ok
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom:  njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen:  njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Acc:  njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill:  njaaman
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc:  njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com:  njammain
    njamma+N+Sg+Abe:  njamattáá
    njamma+N+Ess:  njamman
    njamma+N+Par: njammad
    njamma+N+Pl+Nom:  njamah
    njamma+N+Pl+Gen:  njamai
    njamma+N+Pl+Acc:  [njamaid, njammaid]
    njamma+N+Pl+Ill:  njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Loc:  njammain
    njamma+N+Pl+Com:  [njamaiguin, njamaigijn]
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe:  njamaittáá

  Noun - plasma: # - ok
    plasma+N+Sg+Nom:  plasma
    plasma+N+Sg+Gen:  plasma
    plasma+N+Sg+Acc:  plasma
    plasma+N+Sg+Ill:  plaasman
    plasma+N+Sg+Loc:  plasmaast
    plasma+N+Sg+Com:  plasmain
    plasma+N+Sg+Abe:  plasmattáá
    plasma+N+Ess:  plasman
    plasma+N+Par:  plasmad
    plasma+N+Pl+Nom:  plasmah
    plasma+N+Pl+Gen:  plasmai
    plasma+N+Pl+Acc:  plasmaid
    plasma+N+Pl+Ill:  plasmaid
    plasma+N+Pl+Loc:  plasmain
    plasma+N+Pl+Com:  [plasmaiguin, plasmaigijn]
    plasma+N+Pl+Abe:  plasmaittáá

  Noun - lahna: # - ok
    lahna+N+Sg+Nom:  lahna
    lahna+N+Sg+Gen:  lahna
    lahna+N+Sg+Acc:  lahna
    lahna+N+Sg+Ill:  laahnan
    lahna+N+Sg+Loc:  lahnaast
    lahna+N+Sg+Com:  lahnain
    lahna+N+Sg+Abe:  lahnattáá
    lahna+N+Ess:  lahnan
    lahna+N+Par:  lahnad
    lahna+N+Pl+Nom:  lahnah
    lahna+N+Pl+Gen:  lahnai
    lahna+N+Pl+Acc:  lahnaid
    lahna+N+Pl+Ill:  lahnaid
    lahna+N+Pl+Loc:  lahnain
    lahna+N+Pl+Com:  [lahnaiguin, lahnaigijn]
    lahna+N+Pl+Abe:  lahnaittáá

  Noun - maila: # - ok
    maila+N+Sg+Nom:  maila
    maila+N+Sg+Gen:  maila
    maila+N+Sg+Acc:  maila
    maila+N+Sg+Ill:  maailan
    maila+N+Sg+Loc:  mailaast
    maila+N+Sg+Com:  mailain
    maila+N+Sg+Abe:  mailattáá
    maila+N+Ess:  mailan
    maila+N+Par:  mailad
    maila+N+Pl+Nom:  mailah
    maila+N+Pl+Gen:  mailai
    maila+N+Pl+Acc:  mailaid
    maila+N+Pl+Ill:  mailaid
    maila+N+Pl+Loc:  mailain
    maila+N+Pl+Com:  [mailaiguin, mailaigijn]
    maila+N+Pl+Abe:  mailaittáá

  Noun - tutka: # - ok
    tutka+N+Sg+Nom:  tutka
    tutka+N+Sg+Gen:  tutka
    tutka+N+Sg+Acc:  tutka
    tutka+N+Sg+Ill:  tuutkan
    tutka+N+Sg+Loc:  tutkaast
    tutka+N+Sg+Com:  tutkain
    tutka+N+Sg+Abe:  tutkattáá
    tutka+N+Ess:  tutkan
    tutka+N+Par:  tutkad
    tutka+N+Pl+Nom:  tutkah
    tutka+N+Pl+Gen:  tutkai
    tutka+N+Pl+Acc:  tutkaid
    tutka+N+Pl+Ill:  tutkaid
    tutka+N+Pl+Loc:  tutkain
    tutka+N+Pl+Com:  [tutkaiguin, tutkaigijn]
    tutka+N+Pl+Abe:  tutkaittáá

  Noun - tundra: # - ok
    tundra+N+Sg+Nom:  tundra
    tundra+N+Sg+Gen:  tundra
    tundra+N+Sg+Acc:  tundra
    tundra+N+Sg+Ill:  tuundran
    tundra+N+Sg+Loc:  tundraast
    tundra+N+Sg+Com:  tundrain
    tundra+N+Sg+Abe:  tundrattáá
    tundra+N+Ess:  tundran
    tundra+N+Par:  tundrad
    tundra+N+Pl+Nom:  tundrah
    tundra+N+Pl+Gen:  tundrai
    tundra+N+Pl+Acc:  tundraid
    tundra+N+Pl+Ill:  tundraid
    tundra+N+Pl+Loc:  tundrain
    tundra+N+Pl+Com:  [tundraiguin, tundraigijn]
    tundra+N+Pl+Abe:  tundraittáá
